Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1907
Records; contents; access.

The following classes of persons shall keep such records for such periods as are specified in regulations adopted by the director to fully and correctly disclose all transactions involved in their business, and shall afford to the director and his representatives access to such places of business, and opportunity, at all reasonable times, to examine the facilities, inventory and records thereof, to copy the records, and to secure samples or specimens of inventory after paying or offering to pay for such sample or specimen:

(1) Any persons who engage in or for intrastate commerce in the business of slaughtering any livestock or poultry, or preparing, freezing, packaging or labeling, buying or selling, transporting, or storing any livestock products or poultry products for human food or animal feed; or

(2) Any persons who engage in or for intrastate commerce in the business of rendering, pet feed manufacturing, buying, selling, storing, or transporting any wholesome or dead, dying, disabled or diseased livestock or poultry, or parts of the carcasses of any such livestock or poultry which died either by slaughter or otherwise.

Laws 1969, c. 449, § 7, p. 1510.